orig/persPronounLexcErz.lexc
LEXICON PersPronGenCX_DX-1
< %+Indet:0 "@U.DNUM.SG@"> Clitics ;
 Clitics; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!2!LEXICON Pers_Pronouns1_es
!2!< 0:н 0:ь %+Gen:0 %+1Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"  "@C.TNUM@" "@N.TPERS.1@"> Tenses1 ;
!2!< 0:т 0:ь %+Gen:0 %+2Sg:0 "@D.PossPx@"  "@C.TNUM@" "@N.TPERS.2@"> Tenses1 ;
!2!< 0:н 0:з 0:э %+Gen:0 %+3Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@"  "@C.TNUM@" "@N.TPERS.3@"> Tenses1 ;
!2!< 0:н 0:е 0:к %+Gen:0 %+1Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@" "@C.TNUM@" "@N.TPERS.1@"> Tenses1 ;
!2!< 0:н 0:к %+Gen:0 %+2Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@"  "@C.TNUM@" "@N.TPERS.2@"> Tenses1 ;
!2!< 0:с 0:т 0:У4 %+Gen:0 %+3Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"  "@C.TNUM@" "@N.TPERS.3@"> Tenses1 ;
!2!< 0:н 0:с 0:т 0:У4 %+Dial:0 %+Gen:0 %+3Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"  "@C.TNUM@" "@N.TPERS.3@"> Tenses1 ;
!2!!!Derivation for Determinates
!2!< 0:н 0:е %+Gen:0 %+1Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> Determinates1 ; 
!2!< 0:н 0:е %+Gen:0 %+2Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> Determinates1 ;
!2!< 0:т 0:ь %+Gen:0 %+2Sg:0 "@D.PossPx@"> Determinates ;
!2!< 0:н 0:з 0:э %+Gen:0 %+PossPX:0 %+3Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@"> Determinates1 ;
!2!< 0:н 0:е 0:к %+Gen:0 %+PossPX:0 %+1Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@" > Determinates ;
!2!< 0:н 0:к %+Gen:0 %+PossPX:0 %+2Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@" > Determinates ;
!2!< 0:н 0:с 0:т 0:У4 %+Gen:0 %+PossPX:0 %+3Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@" > Determinates ;

!2!< 0:н 0:с 0:е %+Gen:0 %+1Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> Determinates1 ; 
!2!< 0:н 0:с 0:е %+Gen:0 %+2Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> Determinates1 ;
!2!< 0:т 0:с 0:е  %+Gen:0 %+2Sg:0 "@D.PossPx@"> Determinates1 ;
!2!< 0:н 0:з 0:э 0:с 0:е %+Gen:0 %+PossPX:0 %+3Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@"> Determinates1 ;
!2!< 0:н 0:е 0:к 0:с 0:е  %+Gen:0 %+PossPX:0 %+1Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@"> Determinates1 ;
!2!< 0:н 0:к 0:с 0:е %+Gen:0 %+PossPX:0 %+2Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@"> Determinates1 ;
!2!< 0:н 0:с 0:т 0:У4 0:с 0:е %+Gen:0 %+PossPX:0 %+3Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> Determinates1 ;




!2!LEXICON CXPossPX1
!2! CXPossPX1_A ;
!2!< %+1Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> CXPossPX1-CX_1 ;
!2!< %+2Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> CXPossPX1-CX_1 ;

!2!LEXICON CXPossPX1_A
!2!< 0:н 0:з 0:э %+3Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@"> CXPossPX1-CX_1 ;
!2!< 0:н 0:е 0:к %+1Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@"> CXPossPX1-CX ;
!2!< 0:н 0:к %+2Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@"> CXPossPX1-CX ;
!2!< 0:с 0:т 0:У4 %+3Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> CXPossPX1-CX ;
!2!< 0:н 0:с 0:т 0:У4 %+Dial:0 %+3Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> CXPossPX1-CX ;

!2!LEXICON CXPossPX1-CX 
!2!< 0:%^ 0:V1 %+LV:0 "@P.LV.ON@"> CXPossPX1-CX_1 ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:NoV1 %+NoLV:0 "@P.LV.OFF@"> CXPossPX1-CX_1 ;

!2!LEXICON CXPossPX1-CX_1
!2!< 0:%^ 0:в 0:т 0:О1 0:мО1 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Abe:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:д 0:О1 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Abl:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:ш 0:к 0:а 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Comp:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 >  Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:е 0:н 0:ь %+Dat:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@R.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Gen:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@R.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:с 0:т 0:э 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Ela:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:с 0:э 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Ine:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:с 0:ь %+Nom:0 %+Sg:0 %+Det:0 "@P.TNUM.SG@">  Tenses1 ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:Г2 0:а 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Prol:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:к 0:с 0:э 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Transl:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@R.LV.ON@" > Clitics  ;


!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:в 0:т 0:О1 0:м 0:О1 %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Abe:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:д 0:О1 %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Abl:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:ш 0:к 0:а %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Comp:0 >  Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:н 0:ь %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Dat:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:н 0:ь  %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Gen:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:с 0:т 0:э  %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Ela:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:с  %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Ill:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:с 0:э %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Ine:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Nom:0 "@D.LV.ON@" "@P.TNUM.PL@">  Tenses1 ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:Г2 0:а %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Prol:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:к 0:с  %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Transl:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;




!2!LEXICON PossPX
!2!< 0:%^ 0:V1 %+LV:0 %+PossPX:0 "@R.LV.ON@"> PossPX1 ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:NoV1 %+NoLV:0 %+PossPX:0 "@D.LV.ON@"> PossPX1 ;
!2!+NoPossPX: Clitics ;

LEXICON PossPX1
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:У4 %+1Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:м  %+Dial:0 %+1Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:т 0:У4 %+2Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:У4 %+Dial:0 %+2Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:з 0:О1 %+3Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@"> Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:О1 0:к %+1Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@"> Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:к %+2Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@"> Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:с 0:т %+3Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:с 0:т %+Dial:0 %+3Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> Clitics ;

!2!LEXICON Determinates
!2!< 0:%^ 0:V1 %+LV:0 %+PossPX:0 "@P.LV.ON@"> Determinates1;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:NoV1 %+NoLV:0 %+PossPX:0 "@P.LV.OFF@"> Determinates1 ;

!2!LEXICON Determinates1
!2!< 0:%^ 0:с 0:ь %+Nom:0 %+Sg:0 %+Det:0 "@U.LV.ON@" "@P.TNUM.SG@">  Tenses1 ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:в 0:т 0:О1 0:мО1 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Abe:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:д 0:О1 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Abl:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:ш 0:к 0:а 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Comp:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 >  Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:е 0:н 0:ь %+Dat:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@U.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Gen:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@U.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:с 0:т 0:э 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Ela:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:с 0:э 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Ine:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:Г2 0:а 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Prol:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:к 0:с 0:э 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Transl:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@U.LV.ON@" > Clitics  ;



!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:в 0:т 0:О1 0:м 0:О1 %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Abe:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:д 0:О1 %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Abl:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:ш 0:к 0:а %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Comp:0 >  Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:н 0:ь %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Dat:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:н 0:ь  %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Gen:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:с 0:т 0:э  %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Ela:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:с  %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Ill:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:с 0:э %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Ine:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Nom:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" "@P.TNUM.PL@">  Tenses1 ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:Г2 0:а %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Prol:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!2!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:к 0:с  %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Transl:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!
!1!LEXICON Tenses1_Prep-SG
!1!<"@P.TNUM.SG@"> Tenses1 ;

LEXICON Tenses1
+NoPredx: Clitics ;
+LV:^V1  Tenses1_A_ReqVow ; !This provides linking vowel
+NoLV:^NoV1 Tenses1_A  ; !This denies linking vowel
!!2009-09-23!< %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+3Sg:0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitics ;


LEXICON Tenses1_A
!<"@D.LV.ON@">
 Tenses1_A_NoReqVow ;
!<"@U.LV.ON@">
 Tenses1_A_ReqVow ;

LEXICON Tenses1_A_NoReqVow
< 0:А2 0:н %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+1Sg:0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitics ;
< 0:А2 0:т %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+2Sg:0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitics ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+1Pl:0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitics ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:о %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+2Pl:0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitics ;
!!Removing "0:т 0:У4"  
< %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+3Pl:0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitics ;


LEXICON Tenses1_A_ReqVow
< 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:ь %+Pred:0 %+PretII:0 %+1Sg:0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitics ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:т 0:ь %+Pred:0 %+PretII:0 %+2Sg:0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitics ;
< 0:л 0:ь %+Pred:0 %+PretII:0 %+3Sg:0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.PL@" > Clitics ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:е 0:к %+Pred:0 %+PretII:0 %+1Pl:0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitics ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е %+Pred:0 %+PretII:0 %+2Pl:0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitics ;
< 0:л 0:ь 0:т 0:ь %+Pred:0 %+PretII:0 %+3Pl:0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitics ;




!!!!!
!!

LEXICON Clitics
+CliticGak:^Г1ак  # ;
+NoClitic: # ;

END

@C.PossPx@
@C.LV@

@C.TNUM@
@C.TPERS@

@C.DNUM@
